Arkansas, session 2025, HB1820.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 4, Chapter 86, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
4-86-112. Automatic renewal and continuous service offers.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Automatic renewal" means a plan, an arrangement, or a
provision of a contract that contains a free-to-pay conversion or in which a
paid subscription or purchasing agreement is automatically renewed at the end
of a definite term for a subsequent term;
(2)(A) "Clear and conspicuous" means language that is in larger
type than the surrounding text, or in contrasting type, font, or color to the
surrounding text of the same size, or set off from the surrounding text of
the same size by symbols or other marks, in a manner that clearly calls
attention to the language.
(B) In the case of an audio disclosure, “clear and
conspicuous” means language at a volume and in a cadence sufficient to be
readily audible and understandable;
(3) "Consumer" means an individual located in this state who
seeks or acquires, by purchase or lease, goods, services, money, or credit
*ANS156*
04-07-2025 18:16:36 ANS156

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 S4/7/25 HB1820
for personal, family, or household purposes;
(4) "Continuous service" means a plan, an arrangement, or a
provision of a contract that contains a free-to-pay conversion or in which a
paid subscription or purchasing agreement continues until the consumer
cancels the service;
(5) "Free-to-pay conversion" means, in an offer or agreement to
sell or provide goods or services, a provision under which a customer
receives goods or a service for free for an initial period and will incur an
obligation to pay for the goods or service if the customer does not take
affirmative action to cancel the goods or service before the end of the
specified period;
(6)(A) "Municipal utility" means a utility owned or operated by
a municipality that provides:
(i) Electricity;
(ii) Water;
(iii) Wastewater;
(iv) Cable television; or
(v) Broadband service.
(B) "Municipal utility" includes without limitation a:
(i) Consolidated waterworks system under the
Consolidated Waterworks Authorization Act, § 25-20-301 et seq.;
(ii) Utility managed or operated by a nonprofit
corporation under § 14-199-701 et seq.; and
(iii) Utility owned or operated by a municipality or
by a consolidated utility district under the General Consolidated Public
Utility System Improvement District Law, § 14-217-101 et seq.;
(7) "Local government" means:
(A) A county;
(B) A city of the first class, a city of the second class,
or an incorporated town; or
(C) Any other state entity or political subdivision of the
state or an agency, board, or commission of the state entity or political
subdivision of the state; and
(8) "Offer terms" means the following clear and conspicuous
disclosures:
(A) That the subscription or purchasing agreement will
04-07-2025 18:16:36 ANS156

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 S4/7/25 HB1820
continue until the consumer cancels the subscription or purchasing agreement;
(B) The description of the cancellation policy that
applies to the offer;
(C) The recurring charges that will be charged to the
consumer’s credit or debit card or payment account with a third party as part
of the automatic renewal plan or arrangement, and that the amount of the
charge may change, and if that is the case, include the amount to which the
charge will change, if known;
(D) The length of the term of the automatic renewal or
continuous service, unless the length of the term is chosen by the consumer;
and
(E) The minimum purchase obligation, if any.
(b) A business shall not provide offer terms to a consumer that:
(1)(A) Fail to present the offer terms in a clear and
conspicuous manner before the subscription or purchasing agreement is
fulfilled and in visual proximity, or, in the case of an offer conveyed
verbally, in temporal proximity, to the request for consent to the offer.
(B) If the offer includes a free gift or trial, the offer
shall include a clear and conspicuous explanation of the price that will be
charged after the trial ends or the manner in which the subscription or
purchasing agreement pricing will change upon conclusion of the trial;
(2) Charge the consumer’s credit or debit card, or the
consumer’s account with a third party for an automatic renewal or continuous
service without first obtaining the consumer’s consent to the agreement
containing the offer terms, including the offer terms that are made at a
promotional or discounted price for a limited period of time;
(3)(A) Fail to provide an acknowledgment that includes the offer
terms, cancellation policy, and information regarding how to cancel the
policy in a manner that is capable of being retained by the consumer.
(B) If the offer terms include a free gift or trial, the
business shall disclose in the acknowledgment how to cancel the free gift or
trial and allow the consumer to cancel the automatic renewal or continuous
service before the consumer pays for the goods or services;
(4) Fail to obtain the consumer’s express consent to the offer
terms;
(5) Include any information in the contract that interferes
04-07-2025 18:16:36 ANS156

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 S4/7/25 HB1820
with, detracts from, contradicts, or otherwise undermines the ability of a
consumer to provide the consumer's consent to the automatic renewal or
continuous service;
(6) Fail to maintain verification of the consumer’s consent for
at least three (3) years, or one (1) year after the contract is terminated,
whichever period is longer;
(7) Misrepresent, expressly or by implication, any material fact
related to the transaction, including without limitation:
(A) The inclusion of an automatic renewal or continuous
service; or
(B) Any material fact related to the underlying goods or
service; and
(8) Fail to provide a consumer with a notice, before confirming
the consumer’s billing information and as may be required by subsection (c)
of this section, that clearly and conspicuously states:
(A) That the automatic renewal or continuous service will
automatically renew unless the consumer cancels the automatic renewal or
continuous service;
(B) The length and any additional terms of the renewal
period;
(C) The amount or range of costs the consumer will be
charged and, if applicable, the frequency of those charges a consumer will
incur unless the consumer takes timely steps to prevent or stop those
charges;
(D) One (1) or more methods by which a consumer can cancel
the automatic renewal or continuous service;
(E) If the notice required by this subdivision (b)(8) is
sent electronically, the notice shall include:
(i) A link that directs the consumer to the
cancellation process; or
(ii) Another reasonably accessible electronic method
that directs the consumer to the cancellation process if a link is not
available; and
(F) Contact information for the business.
(c)(1) Except as required under subdivision (c)(2) of this section, a
business shall provide a consumer with the notice required under subdivision
04-07-2025 18:16:36 ANS156

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 S4/7/25 HB1820
(b)(8) of this section if either of the following occurred:
(A)(i) The consumer accepted a free gift or trial, lasting
for more than thirty-one (31) days, that was included in an automatic renewal
offer or continuous service offer or the consumer accepted an automatic
renewal offer or continuous service offer at a promotional or discounted
price, and the applicability of that price was more than thirty-one (31)
days.
(ii)(a) The notice required under subdivision (b)(8)
of this section shall be provided at least three (3) days before and at most
twenty-one (21) days before the expiration of the predetermined period of
time for which the free gift or trial or promotional or discounted price,
applies.
(b) As used in subdivision (c)(1)(A)(ii)
of this section, "free gift" does not include a free promotional item or gift
given by the business that differs from the subscription.
(iii) This subdivision (c)(1)(A)(ii) does not apply
to an offer if the consumer does not enter into the contract electronically
and the business has not collected or maintained the consumer’s valid email
address, telephone number, or other means of notifying the consumer
electronically; or
(B)(i) The consumer accepted offer terms with an initial
term of one (1) year or longer, that automatically renews unless the consumer
cancels the automatic renewal or continuous service.
(ii) The notice required under subdivision (b)(8) of
this section shall be provided at least fifteen (15) days and not more than
forty-five (45) days before the automatic renewal offer or continuous service
offer renews.
(2) If offer terms requires a notice be provided under both
subdivision (c)(1)(A) or subdivision (c)(1)(B) of this section, then only the
notice required to be provided under subdivision (c)(1)(B) of this section
shall be required.
(d)(1) A business that makes an automatic renewal offer or continuous
service offer shall provide a toll-free telephone number, an email address, a
postal address, if the seller directly bills the consumer, or it shall
provide another cost-effective, timely, and easy-to-use mechanism for
cancellation that shall be described in the acknowledgment specified under
04-07-2025 18:16:36 ANS156

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 S4/7/25 HB1820
subdivision (b)(3) of this section.
(2)(A) Except as provided under subdivision (d)(2)(B) of this
section, if a business provides a mechanism for cancellation by toll-free
telephone number, the business:
(i) Shall answer calls promptly during normal
business hours; and
(ii) Shall not obstruct or delay the consumer’s
ability to cancel the automatic renewal or continuous service.
(B) If a consumer leaves a voicemail with a business
requesting cancellation, the business shall, within one (1) business day,
process the requested cancellation or call the consumer back regarding the
cancellation request.
(e)(1) In addition to the requirements of subsection (c) of this
section, a business that allows a consumer to accept an automatic renewal
offer or continuous service offer online shall allow a consumer to terminate
the automatic renewal or continuous service exclusively online, at will, and
without engaging any further steps that obstruct or delay the consumer’s
ability to terminate immediately the automatic renewal or continuous service.
(2) The business shall provide a method of termination that is
online in the form of:
(A) A prominently located direct link or button that may
be located within either a customer account or profile, or within either
device or user settings; or
(B) By an immediately accessible termination email
formatted and provided by the business that a consumer can send to the
business without additional information.
(3) The termination requirements of this subsection shall apply
to the offer terms of the contract and the remaining provisions of the
contract that continue to be governed by all applicable laws and rules.
(4)(A) Notwithstanding subdivision (d)(1) of this section, a
business may require a consumer to enter account information or otherwise
authenticate his or her identity online before termination of the automatic
renewal or continuous service online if the consumer has an account with the
business.
(B) A consumer who is unwilling or unable to enter account
information or otherwise authenticate his or her identity online before
04-07-2025 18:16:36 ANS156

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 S4/7/25 HB1820
termination of the automatic renewal or continuous service online under
subdivision (e)(4)(A) of this section shall not be precluded from
authenticating or terminating the automatic renewal or continuous service
offline using another method under subsection (d) of this section.
(f) Under subsections (d) and (e) of this section, a business that
provides a discount offer or other consumer benefit or informs a consumer of
the effect of the cancellation shall not be considered to be an obstruction
or delay, if the consumer remains able to cancel the automatic renewal or
continuous service, as follows:
(1)(A) If the consumer requests to cancel by telephone, the
business may present the consumer with a discounted offer, retention benefit,
or information regarding the effect of cancellation, if the business first
clearly and conspicuously informs the consumer that the consumer may complete
the cancellation process at any time by stating that the consumer wants to
“cancel” or words to that effect.
(B) If the consumer states the consumer's intention to
"cancel" or words to that effect, the business shall promptly process the
cancellation and shall not otherwise obstruct or delay the consumer’s ability
to cancel the automatic renewal or continuous service; and
(2)(A) If a consumer conveys a request to cancel using an online
system, the business may display a discounted offer, retention benefit, or
information regarding the effects of cancellation, provided that the business
simultaneously displays a prominently located and continuously and
proximately displayed direct link or button entitled "click to cancel", or
words to that effect, with the presentation of the discounted offer, other
consumer benefit, or information.
(B) If the consumer utilizes the direct link or button
under subdivision (f)(2)(A) of this section, the business shall promptly
process the cancellation and shall not otherwise obstruct or delay the
consumer’s ability to proceed to cancellation.
(g)(1) The ability to cancel the automatic renewal or continuous
service under subsection (d) or subsection (e) of this section shall be
available to a consumer in the same medium that the consumer used in the
transaction that resulted in the activation of the automatic renewal or
continuous service, or the same medium in which the consumer is accustomed to
interacting with the business, including without limitation in person, by
04-07-2025 18:16:36 ANS156

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 S4/7/25 HB1820
telephone, by mail, or by email.
(2)(A) If the activation of the automatic renewal or continuous
service was by telephone, a telephone number that is capable of being
retained by the consumer shall be available to the consumer to cancel the
automatic renewal or continuous service.
(B) The telephone number under subdivision (g)(2)(A) of
this section shall be clearly and conspicuously displayed on the business’s
website, if applicable.
(h)(1) If there is a material change in the terms of the automatic
renewal or continuous service that has been accepted by a consumer in this
state, the business shall provide:
(A) The consumer with a clear and conspicuous notice of
the material change; and
(B) Information regarding how to cancel in a manner that
is capable of being retained by the consumer.
(2) If there is a change in the fee charged under existing offer
terms that has been accepted by a consumer in this state, including changes
the consumer affirmatively consented to in an existing plan or arrangement,
the business shall provide, no less than seven (7) days and no more than
thirty (30) days before the fee change takes effect, the consumer with:
(A) A clear and conspicuous notice of the fee change; and
(B) Information regarding how to cancel in a manner that
is capable of being retained by the consumer.
(i)(1)(A) A business shall send an annual reminder to a consumer under
an annual automatic renewal agreement or continuous service agreement with
the business in the same medium that resulted in the activation of the
automatic renewal or continuous service, or the same medium in which the
customer is accustomed to interacting with the business, including without
limitation, by telephone, mail, or email.
(B) For original in-person or voice-based transactions,
the business shall send the reminder required under subdivision (i)(1)(A) of
this section by telephone, mail, or any internet-based communication.
(2) The reminder sent under subdivision (i)(1)(A) of this
section shall disclose:
(A) The product or service to which the automatic renewal
or continuous service applies;
04-07-2025 18:16:36 ANS156

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 S4/7/25 HB1820
(B) The frequency and amount of charges associated with
the automatic renewal or continuous service; and
(C) The means to cancel the automatic renewal or
continuous service.
(j)(1) Except as provided under subdivision (j)(2) of this section,
the requirements of this section shall apply only before the completion of
the initial order for the automatic renewal or continuous service.
(2) The requirements in:
(A) Subdivisions (b)(3) and (b)(8) of this section may be
fulfilled after completion of the initial order;
(B) Subsection (c) of this section may be fulfilled after
completion of the initial order;
(C) Subsection (h) of this section shall be fulfilled
prior to implementation of the material change or fee change; and
(D) Subsection (i) of this section shall be fulfilled
annually.
(k) This section does not apply to:
(1) A person subject to the jurisdiction of the:
(A) Bank Commissioner under the Arkansas Banking Code of
1997, chapters 45-50 of Title 23;
(B) Securities Commissioner under the Arkansas Securities
Act, § 23-42-101 et seq.;
(C) Insurance Commissioner under the:
(i) Arkansas Insurance Code; or
(ii) Service Contracts Act, § 4-114-101 et seq.;
(D) The Arkansas Public Service Commission under § 23-3-
101 et seq.; or
(E) The Federal Communications Commission excluding those
persons providing satellite digital radio services;
(2) A municipal utility;
(3) A service provider or its affiliate or subsidiary if the
service provider or its affiliate or subsidiary is doing business under a
franchise issued by the state or a local government; or
(4) An entity regulated by the Division of Arkansas State Police
under the Private Security Agency, Private Investigator, and School Security
Licensing and Credentialing Act, § 17-40-101 et seq.
04-07-2025 18:16:36 ANS156

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 S4/7/25 HB1820
(l)(1) A violation of this section shall constitute an unfair or
deceptive act or practice as defined by the Deceptive Trade Practices Act, §
4-88-101 et seq.
(2) All remedies, penalties, and authority granted to the
Attorney General under the Deceptive Trade Practices Act, § 4-88-101 et seq.,
shall be available to the Attorney General for the enforcement of this
section.

/s/M. Brown



























04-07-2025 18:16:36 ANS156